Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-928
Person; challenge as alien; information required.

If a person is challenged on the ground that he or she has not become a citizen of the United States and the person so challenged does not produce his or her naturalization papers, the person shall print on the form provided by the election commissioner or county clerk the following information:

Place of birth—show the state, country, kingdom, empire, or dominion where the applicant was born.

Naturalized—the word Yes or No or Native, and if applicant is not native-born or has lost citizenship, show whether naturalized by his or her own papers, parent's papers, or spouse's papers and the court, county, state, and date of naturalization as the same appears in the naturalization papers.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 271.